Utah statutes.
63G-4-204.   Procedures for formal adjudicative proceedings -- Responsive pleadings.

(1)  In all formal adjudicative proceedings, unless modified by rule according to Subsection 63G-4-201(5), the respondent, if any, shall file and serve a written response signed by the respondent or the respondent's representative within 30 days of the mailing date or last date of publication of the notice of agency action or the notice under Subsection 63G-4-201(3)(d), which shall include:

(a)  the agency's file number or other reference number;

(b)  the name of the adjudicative proceeding;

(c)  a statement of the relief that the respondent seeks;

(d)  a statement of the facts; and

(e)  a statement summarizing the reasons that the relief requested should be granted.

(2) The respondent shall send a copy of the response filed under Subsection (1) to each party.

(3)  The presiding officer, or the agency by rule, may permit or require pleadings in addition to the notice of agency action, the request for agency action, and the response.  All documents permitted or required to be filed shall be filed with the agency and one copy shall be sent to each party.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

